Utah statutes.
31A-2-201.2.   Evaluation of Health Insurance Market.
(1)  Each year the commissioner shall:
(a)  conduct an evaluation of the state's health insurance market;
(b)  report the findings of the evaluation to the Health and Human Services
Interim Committee before October 1 of each year; and
(c)  publish the findings of the evaluation on the department website.
(2)  The evaluation required by this section shall:
(a)  analyze the effectiveness of the insurance regulations and statutes in
promoting a healthy, competitive health insurance market that meets the needs
of the state, and includes an analysis of:
(i)  the availability and marketing of individual and group products;
(ii)  rate changes;
(iii)  coverage and demographic changes;
(iv)  benefit trends;
(v)  market share changes; and
(vi)  accessibility;
(b)  assess complaint ratios and trends within the health insurance market,
which assessment shall include complaint data from the Office of Consumer
Health Assistance within the department;
(c)  contain recommendations for action to improve the overall effectiveness
of the health insurance market, administrative rules, and statutes; and
(d)  include claims loss ratio data for each health insurance company doing
business in the state.
(3)  When preparing the evaluation required by this section, the commissioner
shall include a report of:
(a)  the types of health benefit plans sold in the Health Insurance Exchange
created in Section 63M-1-2504;
(b)  the number of insurers participating in the defined contribution
arrangement health benefit plans in the Health Insurance Exchange;
(c)  the number of employers and covered lives in the defined contribution
arrangement market in the Health Insurance Exchange; and
(d)  the number of lives covered by health benefit plans that do not include
state mandates as permitted by Subsection 31A-30-109(2).
(4)  When preparing the evaluation and report required by this section, the
commissioner may seek the input of insurers, employers, insured persons,
providers, and others with an interest in the health insurance market.
(5)  The commissioner may adopt administrative rules for the purpose of
collecting the data required by this section, taking into account the business
confidentiality of the insurers.
(6)  Records submitted to the commissioner under this section shall be
maintained by the commissioner as protected records under Title 63G, Chapter
2, Government Records Access and Management Act.
